Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2617
Rights and remedies.

(1) The Assistive Technology Regulation Act shall not limit rights or remedies available to a consumer under any other law.

(2) Any waiver of rights by a consumer under the act shall be void.

(3) In addition to pursuing any other remedy, a consumer may bring an action to recover for any damages caused by a violation of the act. The court shall award a consumer who prevails in such an action the amount of any pecuniary loss, together with costs, disbursements, reasonable attorney's fees, and any equitable relief that the court determines is appropriate.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 17.